Washington statutes.
RCW 19.110.030

Sale or lease of business opportunity—Offer to sell or lease business opportunity—Occurrence in Washington.

(1) An offer to sell or offer to lease a business opportunity occurs in Washington when:

(a) The offer is made in Washington; or

(b) The purchaser resides in Washington at the time of the offer and the business opportunity is or will be located, in whole or in part, in the state of Washington; or

(c) The offer originates from Washington; or

(d) The business opportunity is or will be, in whole or in part, located in Washington.

(2) An offer does not occur in Washington if a seller advertises only in a newspaper having more than two-thirds of its circulation outside the state of Washington, or on a radio or television program originating outside the state and does not sell or lease business opportunities in Washington.

(3) A sale or lease of a business opportunity occurs in Washington when:

(a) The sale or lease is made in Washington; or

(b) The purchaser resides in Washington at the time of the sale or lease, and the business opportunity is or will be located, in whole or in part, in Washington; or

(c) The business opportunity is or will be located in Washington.

[ 1981 c 155 s 3.]